Utah statutes.
16-12-3.   Declaration of trust -- Filing fee.

An original and one copy of the declaration of trust of a real estate investment trust shall be delivered to the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code, and the division shall endorse on the original and one copy the word "filed."  The Division of Corporations and Commercial Code shall file the original in the division's office, and shall return the copy to the trustees or their representatives.  The Division of Corporations and Commercial Code may charge a fee pursuant to Section 63J-1-504 for the filing.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

